Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1927
Licensee; change of address; notify Secretary of State.

A licensee shall notify the secretary in writing within ten days after any change in address of a licensee's office or business location. The secretary shall issue a new license for the remainder of the license period which contains the new address.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 27.